Utah statutes.
41-21-1.   Street rod and vintage vehicle defined.
(1) (a)  "Street rod" means a motor vehicle that:
(i) (A)  was manufactured in 1948 or before; or
(B) (I)  was manufactured after 1948 to resemble a vehicle that was
manufactured in 1948 or before; and
(II) (Aa)  has been altered from the manufacturer's original design; or
(Bb)  has a body constructed from non-original materials; and
(ii)  is primarily a collector's item that is used for:
(A)  club activities;
(B)  exhibitions;
(C)  tours;
(D)  parades;
(E)  occasional transportation; and
(F)  other similar uses.
(b)  A street rod does not include a motor vehicle that is used for general,
daily transportation.
(2) (a)  "Vintage vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is 40 years old or
older, from the current year, primarily a collector's item, and used for
participation in club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades, occasional
transportation, and similar uses, but that is not used for general daily
transportation.
(b)  "Vintage vehicle" includes a street rod.
